Illinois, session 104th, SB4059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $30,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for grants to the City of Harvey to pay for operational 8expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.